en: Play Sprinkers
xx: Play Sprinkers
cs: Zábavní kropičky
da: Legetøjssprinklere
de: Wassersprenger für Kinder
es: Aspersores de juego
fr: Jets d'eau pour enfants
it: Spruzzatori
ja: 水遊び用スプリンクラー
nl: Speelwatersproeiers
no: Lekevannspredere
pl: Spryskiwacze do zabawy
pt: Irrigadores de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные разбрызгиватели
sv: Leksakssprinklers
tr: Oyuncak Fıskiyeler

en: Water Parks & Slides
xx: Water Parks & Slides
cs: Nafukovací vodní atrakce a skluzavky
da: Badebassiner og vandrutchebaner
de: Planschbecken und Wasserrutschen
es: Parques acuáticos y toboganes
fr: Piscines et toboggans
it: Parchi e scivoli acquatici
ja: ウォーター パーク、ウォーター スライド
nl: Waterparken en -glijbanen
no: Vannparker og -sklier
pl: Wodne place zabaw i zjeżdżalnie do basenów ogrodowych
pt: Escorregadores e parques aquáticos
ru: Аквапарки и горки
sv: Vattenparker och rutchkanor
tr: Su Parkları ve Kaydıraklar

en: Kiddie Pools
xx: Kiddie Pools
fr: Pataugeoires pour enfants, Pataugeoires, Pataugette

en: Water Blasters
xx: Water Blasters
fr: Pistolets à eau, Pistolet à eau

en: Water Tables
xx: Water Tables
cs: Vodní stolky
da: Vandborde
de: Wassertische
es: Mesas de agua
fr: Tables de jeux d'eau
it: Tavoli ad acqua
ja: 水遊びテーブル
nl: Watertafels
no: Vannbord
pl: Stoliki wodne
pt: Mesas de água
ru: Водяные столики
sv: Vattenbord
tr: Su Masaları

en: Puzzles
xx: Puzzles
cs: Hlavolamy
da: Gådespil
de: Puzzles & Geduldspiele
es: Rompecabezas
fr: Jeux de puzzle, Puzzle
it: Puzzle
ja: パズル
nl: Puzzels
no: Hjernenøtter
pl: Łamigłówki
pt: Quebra-cabeças
ru: Пазлы и головоломки
sv: Läggspel
tr: Yapbozlar

en: Jigsaw Puzzle Accessories
xx: Jigsaw Puzzle Accessories
cs: Skládačky puzzle – příslušenství
da: Puslespil – tilbehør
de: Puzzle-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para puzles
fr: Accessoires pour puzzles
it: Accessori per puzzle
ja: ジグソーパズル関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor legpuzzels
no: Puslespill-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do puzzli
pt: Acessórios para quebra-cabeças
ru: Принадлежности для пазлов
sv: Pusseltillbehör
tr: Yapboz Aksesuarları

en: Jigsaw Puzzles
xx: Jigsaw Puzzles
cs: Puzzle
da: Puslespil
de: Puzzles
es: Puzzles
fr: Puzzles classiques
it: Puzzle in legno
ja: ジグソーパズル
nl: Legpuzzels
no: Puslespill
pl: Puzzle
pt: Quebra-cabeças de peças
ru: Пазлы
sv: Pussel
tr: Karton veya Tahta Yapbozlar

en: Mechanical Puzzles
xx: Mechanical Puzzles
cs: Mechanické puzzle
da: Mekaniske spil
de: Mechanische Geduldspiele
es: Rompecabezas mecánico
fr: Casse-tête
it: Puzzle meccanici
ja: メカニカルパズル・知恵の輪
nl: Mechanische puzzels
no: Mekaniske nøtter
pl: Łamigłówki mechaniczne
pt: Quebra-cabeças mecânicos
ru: Механические головоломки
sv: Mekaniska pussel
tr: Mekanik Yapbozlar

en: Wooden & Pegged Puzzles
xx: Wooden & Pegged Puzzles
cs: Dřevěné a kolíkové puzzle
da: Træpuslespil med knopper
de: Holzsteckpuzzle
es: Puzles de madera y con agarrador
fr: Puzzles à encastrement
it: Puzzle in legno e con pioli
ja: 木製ペグパズル
nl: Houten puzzels
no: Trenøtter og plasseringsnøtter
pl: Łamigłówki drewniane i układanki drewniane
pt: Quebra-cabeças de madeira
ru: Деревянные головоломки
sv: Träpussel och pussel med knoppar
tr: Tahta ve Sabit Yapbozlar

en: Toys
xx: Toys
ar: ألعاب
as: খেলনা
az: Oyuncaqlar
be: Цацкі
bg: Играчки
bn: খেলনা
cs: Hračky
da: Legetøj
de: Spielzeuge\, Spielzeug
el: Παιχνίδια
es: Juguetes
et: Mänguasjad
fa: اسباب بازی
fi: Lelut
fr: Jouets, Jouet
ga: Bréagáin
gu: રમકડાં
hi: खिलौने
hr: Igračke
hu: Játékok
hy: Խաղալիքներ
id: Mainan
is: Leikföng
it: Giocattoli
ja: おもちゃ
jw: Dolanan
ka: სათამაშოები
kk: Ойыншықтар
km: ប្រដាប់ក្មេងលេង
kn: ಆಟಿಕೆಗಳು
ko: 장난감
ky: Оюнчуктар
lt: Žaislai
lv: Rotaļlietas
mk: Играчки
ml: കളിപ്പാട്ടങ്ങൾ
mn: Тоглоом
mr: खेळणी
ms: Mainan
mt: Ġugarelli
my: အရုပ်များ
ne: खेलौनाहरू
nl: Speelgoed
no: Leker
or: ଖେଳନା
pa: ਖਿਡੌਣੇ
pl: Zabawki
ps: لوبو
pt: Brinquedos
ro: Jucării
ru: Игрушки
sd: راندڪا
si: සෙල්ලම් බඩු
sk: Hračky
sl: Igrače
so: Alaabta carruurtu ku ciyaarto
sq: Lodra
sr: Играчке
sv: Leksaker
sw: Vinyago
ta: பொம்மைகள்
te: బొమ్మలు
tg: Бозичаҳо
th: ของเล่น
tk: Oýunjaklar
tl: Mga laruan
tr: Oyuncaklar
uk: Іграшки
ur: کھلونے
uz: O'yinchoqlar
vi: Đồ chơi
xh: Amathoyizi
yo: Awọn nkan isere
zh: 玩具
zu: Amathoyizi

en: Activity Toys
xx: Activity Toys
cs: Aktivní hračky
da: Aktivitetslegetøj
de: Interaktives Spielzeug
es: Juguetes de actividad
fr: Jouets d'activité
it: Giochi di attività
ja: アクティビティトイ
nl: Buitenspeelgoed
no: Aktivitetsleker
pl: Zabawki ruchowe
pt: Brinquedos de atividades
ru: Развивающие игрушки
sv: Aktivitetsleksaker
tr: Aktivite Oyuncakları

en: Ball & Cup Games
xx: Ball & Cup Games
cs: Chytání míčku do kalíšku
da: Spil med bold og kop
de: Ball- & Becherspiele
es: Juegos de vasos y bolas
fr: Bilboquets
it: Giocattoli con palla e coppa
ja: けん玉
nl: Spellen met ballen en balvangers
no: Spill med ball og beger
pl: Zabawki zręcznościowe typu kendama
pt: Bilboquê
ru: Игры бильбоке
sv: Boll- och bägarspel
tr: Fincan-Top Oyunları

en: Bouncy Balls
xx: Bouncy Balls
cs: Skákací míče
da: Hoppebolde
de: Flummis
es: Pelotas saltarinas
fr: Balles rebondissantes
it: Palle rimbalzanti
ja: ゴムボール
nl: Stuiterballen
no: Sprettballer
pl: Piłki do skakania
pt: Bolinhas pula-pula
ru: Каучуковые шарики
sv: Studsbollar
tr: Zıplayan Toplar

en: Bubble Blowing Solution
xx: Bubble Blowing Solution
cs: Roztok do bublifuku
da: Sæbebobler
de: Seifenblasen
es: Líquido para pompas de jabón
fr: Solution bulles de savon
it: Soluzioni per bolle
ja: しゃぼん玉液
nl: Bellenblaassop
no: Såpeboblevæske
pl: Płyny do dmuchania baniek
pt: Solução para bolha de sabão
ru: Растворы для мыльных пузырей
sv: Såpbubblelösning
tr: Baloncuk Üfleme Sıvısı

en: Bubble Blowing Toys
xx: Bubble Blowing Toys
cs: Bublifuky
da: Sæbeboblelegetøj
de: Seifenblasen-Spielzeug
es: Juguetes para hacer pompas de jabón
fr: Jeux de bulles de savon
it: Giochi per bolle di sapone
ja: しゃぼん玉
nl: Bellenblaasspeelgoed
no: Leketøy for bobleblåsing
pl: Zabawki do dmuchania baniek
pt: Brinquedos de bola de sabão
ru: Игрушки для выдувания мыльных пузырей
sv: Såpbubbleleksaker
tr: Baloncuk Üfleme Oyuncakları

en: Coiled Spring Toys
xx: Coiled Spring Toys
cs: Spirálové pružiny
da: Gående fjeder-legetøj
de: Springspirale
es: Muelles mágicos
fr: Ressorts
it: Giochi a molla
ja: レインボースプリング
nl: Speelgoed met springveren
no: Trappetroll
pl: Zabawki na sprężynie
pt: Molas de brinquedo
ru: Андамании
sv: Trappfjädrar
tr: Yay Şekilli Oyuncaklar

en: Marbles
xx: Marbles
cs: Kuličky
da: Marmorkugler
de: Murmeln
es: Canicas
fr: Billes
it: Biglie
ja: ビー玉
nl: Knikkers
no: Klinkekuler
pl: Kulki
pt: Bolas de gude
ru: Марблы
sv: Spelkulor
tr: Bilyeler

en: Paddle Ball Toys
xx: Paddle Ball Toys
cs: Pálky na paddleball pro děti
da: Ping pong-bat
de: Paddleball-Spiele
es: Juguetes de padbol
fr: Raquettes tap-tap
it: Giocattoli con palla e racchetta
ja: パドルボール
nl: Peddelbalspellen
no: Leker med ball og racket
pl: Zabawki z paletką i piłką
pt: Raquete com bola presa de brinquedo
ru: Игрушки для пэдлбола
sv: Paddelbolleksaker
tr: Top Sektirme Oyuncakları

en: Ribbon & Streamer Toys
xx: Ribbon & Streamer Toys
cs: Dětské gymnastické stuhy
da: Legetøj med bånd
de: Spiele mit Bändern
es: Juguetes con cintas y serpentinas
fr: Rubans de gymnastique
it: Giochi con nastri e fettucce
ja: リボン・吹き流し
nl: Speelgoed met linten en wimpels
no: Leker med vimpler og bånd
pl: Zabawki ze wstęgą
pt: Brinquedos com fitas e serpentinas
ru: Игрушки с лентами
sv: Band- och vimpelleksaker
tr: Şerit ve Serpantin Oyuncaklar